California, session 20252026, SB363.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1374.37 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1374.37. (a) A health care service plan shall report every treatment denial or modification to the department in accordance with all of the following requirements: (1) Every treatment denial or modification shall be separated by type of care into the following categories: (A) Surgical/Medical.(B) Behavioral.(2) Every treatment denial or modification shall be separated by diagnosis category or subcategory as determined by the department. The department shall coordinate with the Department of Insurance to ensure consistent diagnosis categories or subcategories across both departments.(3) Reporting shall be disaggregated by age.(4) To the extent that demographic data is available, reporting shall be disaggregated by categories determined in accordance with the department’s recommendation in coordination with the Department of Insurance.(5) Reporting shall include information on the health care service plan’s number of denials and modifications. A health care service plan shall report the applicable reason for each denial or modification by selecting from all of the following categories: (A) Medical necessity.(B) Investigative or experimental.(C) Emergency or urgent care reimbursement.(D) Incorrect billing.(E) Duplicate claims.(F) Out-of-network provider.(G) Insufficient information, including medical records and patient or provider signature.(H) Ineligibility or coverage issue.(I) Lack of timely submission.(J) (i) Other.(ii) If other is designated, the health care service plan shall specify the reason for the denial or modification. (6) Reporting on modifications shall include information on the type of modifications made. (b) A health care service plan shall report to the department on an annual basis the total number of claims that the plan processed in the prior year.(c) A health care service plan shall submit its first report required by subdivisions (a) and (b) to the department on or before June 1, 2026, and annually thereafter. (d) (1) The department shall ensure that both of the following are included in a report, as specified in paragraphs (2) and (3), at least once per year, beginning January 1, 2028:(A) Data, analysis, and conclusions relating to information required to be reported by health care service plans pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b).(B) Data, analysis, and conclusions relating to compliance with, or violations of, Section 1374.38, including, but not limited to, the number of independent medical review overturns of, and reversals of, treatment denials and modifications.(2) If the department publishes a report not required by this code and relating to independent medical reviews, the department shall include in the report the information specified in paragraph (1).(3) If the department is not required to include the information in a report pursuant to paragraph (2), the department shall include the information in the report required by subdivision (f) of Section 1375.7.(4) The department shall ensure that a report required to include the information specified in paragraph (1) is published on its internet website. SEC. 2. Section 1374.38 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1374.38. (a) (1) For each annual report submitted to the department by a health care service plan pursuant to Section 1374.37, the department shall compare the number of a health care service plan’s treatment denials and modifications to both of the following:(A) The number of successful independent medical review overturns of a health care service plan’s treatment denials or modifications.(B) The number of treatment denials or modifications reversed by the health care service plan after an independent medical review for the denial or modification is requested, filed, or applied for.(2) (A) For a health care service plan with 10 or more independent medical reviews in a given year, if more than 50 percent of a health care service plan’s independent medical reviews result in an overturning or reversal of a treatment denial or modification in any one individual category enumerated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1374.37, the health care service plan is in violation of this section and liable for an administrative penalty pursuant to subdivision (b). A health care service plan may be liable for multiple violations per annual report.(B) Each independent medical review resulting in an additional overturned or reversed denial or modification in excess of the threshold described in subparagraph (A) constitutes a separate violation of this section.(C) For purposes of this section, an independent medical review results in an overturning or reversal of a treatment denial or modification any time a treatment denial or modification is overturned or reversed after an independent medical review is requested, filed, or applied for, regardless of whether a determination is made by an independent medical review organization or health care service plan.(3)A failure to report a treatment denial or modification to the department pursuant to Section 1374.37 is a violation of this section.(b) A health care service plan that violates this section, or that violates any rule or order adopted or issued pursuant to this section, is liable for administrative penalties of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for the first violation, and of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) nor more than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for the second violation, and of not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for each subsequent violation.(c) The administrative penalties available to the director pursuant to this section are not exclusive, and may be sought and employed in any combination with civil, criminal, and other administrative remedies deemed advisable by the director to enforce the provisions of this chapter.(d) Commencing January 1, 2031, and every five years thereafter, the penalty amounts specified in this section shall be adjusted to reflect the percentage change in the calendar year average, for the five-year period, of the medical care index of the Consumer Price Index, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.(e) (1) The Managed Care Independent Medical Review Administrative Penalties Subaccount is hereby created in the Managed Care Administrative Fines and Penalties Fund, as described in Section 1341.45, for the receipt and deposit of moneys generated from the administrative penalties assessed pursuant to this section. (2) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the subaccount may be expended for both of the following purposes:(A) To offset the reasonable costs of implementing this section and Section 1374.37.(B) For other purposes of the Managed Care Administrative Fines and Penalties Fund, as specified in Section 1341.45. SEC. 3. Section 10169.6 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10169.6. (a) A health insurer shall report every treatment denial or modification to the department in accordance with all of the following requirements: (1) Every treatment denial or modification shall be separated by type of care into the following categories:(A) Surgical/Medical.(B) Behavioral.(2) Every treatment denial or modification shall be separated by diagnosis category or subcategory as determined by the department. The department shall coordinate with the Department of Managed Health Care to ensure consistent diagnosis categories or subcategories across both departments.(3) Reporting shall be disaggregated by age.(4) To the extent that demographic data is available, reporting shall be disaggregated by categories determined in accordance with the department’s recommendation in coordination with the Department of Managed Health Care.(5) Reporting shall include information on the health insurer’s number of denials and modifications. A health insurer shall report the applicable reason for each denial or modification by selecting from all of the following categories:(A) Medical necessity.(B) Investigative or experimental.(C) Emergency or urgent care reimbursement. (D) Incorrect billing.(E) Duplicate claims.(F) Out-of-network provider.(G) Insufficient information, including medical records and patient or provider signature.(H) Ineligibility or coverage issue.(I) Lack of timely submission.(J) (i) Other.(ii) If other is designated, the health insurer shall specify the reason for the denial or modification. (6) Reporting on modifications shall include information on the type of modifications made.(b) A health insurer shall report to the department on an annual basis the total number of claims that the insurer processed in the prior year. (c) A health insurer shall submit its first report required by subdivisions (a) and (b) to the department on or before June 1, 2026, and annually thereafter. (d) (1) The department shall include in the annual report of the commissioner required by Section 12922, commencing with the 2028 report, both of the following:(A) Data, analysis, and conclusions relating to information required to be reported by health insurers pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b).(B) Data, analysis, and conclusions relating to compliance with, or violations of, Section 10169.7, including, but not limited to, the number of independent medical review overturns of, and reversals of, treatment denials and modifications.(2) The department shall ensure that the report required to include the information specified in paragraph (1) is published on its internet website. SEC. 4. Section 10169.7 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10169.7. (a) (1) For each annual report submitted to the department by a health insurer pursuant to Section 10169.6, the department shall compare the number of a health insurer’s treatment denials and modifications to both of the following:(A) The number of successful independent medical review overturns of a health insurer’s treatment denials or modifications.(B) The number of treatment denials or modifications reversed by the health insurer after an independent medical review for the denial or modification is requested, filed, or applied for.(2) (A) For a health insurer with 10 or more independent medical reviews in a given year, if more than 50 percent of a health insurer’s independent medical reviews result in an overturning or reversal of a treatment denial or modification in any one individual category enumerated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10169.6, the health insurer is in violation of this section and liable for an administrative penalty pursuant to subdivision (b). A health insurer may be liable for multiple violations per annual report.(B) Each independent medical review resulting in an additional overturned or reversed denial or modification in excess of the threshold described in subparagraph (A) constitutes a separate violation of this section.(C) For purposes of this section, an independent medical review results in an overturning or reversal of a treatment denial or modification any time a treatment denial or modification is overturned or reversed after an independent medical review is requested, filed, or applied for, regardless of whether a determination is made by an independent medical review organization or health insurer.(3)A failure to report a treatment denial or modification to the department pursuant to Section 10169.6 is a violation of this section.(b) A health insurer that violates this section, or that violates any rule or order adopted or issued pursuant to this section, is liable for administrative penalties of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for the first violation, and of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) nor more than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for the second violation, and of not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for each subsequent violation.(c) The administrative penalties available to the commissioner pursuant to this section are not exclusive, and may be sought and employed in any combination with civil, criminal, and other administrative remedies deemed advisable by the commissioner to enforce the provisions of this chapter.(d) Commencing January 1, 2031, and every five years thereafter, the penalty amounts specified in this section shall be adjusted to reflect the percentage change in the calendar year average, for the five-year period, of the medical care index of the Consumer Price Index, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.(e) (1) The Health Insurance Independent Medical Review Administrative Penalties Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury for the receipt and deposit of moneys generated from the administrative penalties assessed pursuant to this section. (2) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the fund may be expended to offset the reasonable costs of implementing this section and Section 10169.6.SEC. 5. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 6. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.